Washington statutes.
RCW 7.60.005

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context requires otherwise.

(1) "Court" means the superior court of this state in which the receivership is pending.

(2) "Entity" means a person other than a natural person.

(3) "Estate" means the entirety of the property with respect to which a receiver's appointment applies, but does not include trust fund taxes or property of an individual person exempt from execution under the laws of this state. Estate property includes any nonexempt interest in property that is partially exempt, including fee title to property subject to a homestead exemption under chapter 6.13 RCW.

(4) "Executory contract" means a contract where the obligation of both the person over whose property the receiver is appointed and the other party to the contract are so far unperformed that the failure of either party to the contract to complete performance would constitute a material breach of the contract, thereby excusing the other party's performance of the contract.

(5) "Insolvent" or "insolvency" means a financial condition of a person such that the sum of the person's debts and other obligations is greater than all of that person's property, at a fair valuation, exclusive of (a) property transferred, concealed, or removed with intent to hinder, delay, or defraud any creditors of the person, and (b) any property exempt from execution under any statutes of this state.

(6) "Lien" means a charge against or interest in property to secure payment of a debt or the performance of an obligation.

(7) "Notice and a hearing" or any similar phrase means notice and opportunity for a hearing.

(8) "Person" means an individual, corporation, limited liability company, general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, association, governmental entity, or other entity, of any kind or nature.

(9) "Property" includes all right, title, and interests, both legal and equitable, and including any community property interest, in or with respect to any property of a person with respect to which a receiver is appointed, regardless of the manner by which the property has been or is acquired. "Property" includes any proceeds, products, offspring, rents, or profits of or from property in the estate. "Property" does not include any power that a person may exercise solely for the benefit of another person or trust fund taxes.

(10) "Receiver" means a person appointed by the court as the court's agent, and subject to the court's direction, to take possession of, manage, or dispose of property of a person.

(11) "Receivership" means the case in which the receiver is appointed. "General receivership" means a receivership in which a general receiver is appointed. "Custodial receivership" means a receivership in which a custodial receiver is appointed.

(12) "Security interest" means a lien created by an agreement.

(13) "State agent" and "state agency" means any office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other agency of the state of Washington or of any subdivision thereof, or any individual acting in an official capacity on behalf of any state agent or state agency.

(14) "Utility" means a person providing any service regulated by the utilities and transportation commission.

[ 2004 c 165 s 2.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2004 c 165: "The purpose of this act is to create more comprehensive, streamlined, and cost-effective procedures applicable to proceedings in which property of a person is administered by the courts of this state for the benefit of creditors and other persons having an interest therein." [ 2004 c 165 s 1.]

Captions not law—2004 c 165: "Captions used in this act are not part of the law." [ 2004 c 165 s 48.]